Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-17] Uniformity of application and
construction. In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next